src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BIEGKEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row D - Group IV !impersonals
                                      +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%>%^3sUMLa                     FINAL1       ;
                                          +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i                            FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>         VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                                                  +V+IV+Inf:%>edh                          FINAL1       ;
                                                 +V+IV+VGen:%>en                           FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                                                  +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie                       FINAL1       ;
                                           +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme                    FINAL1       ; !
                                               +V+IV+ConNeg:%>0h                           FINAL1       ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
                                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd    ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:e%»l LES ;
                                      ! +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv                        IV_PASSIVE_L ;
                                      !  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML                    IV_PASSIVE_S ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^1UMLa               FINAL1       ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^iUMLi               FINAL1       ;
             +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»egået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi       FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:%»egået%>edh                   FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+ConNeg:%»egået%>ieh                   FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+VGen:%»egået%>ien                   FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Act:%»egået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ger:%»egået%>ieminie               FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»egået%>%^1UMLeme             FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»est%>%^DISIMPe               FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»est%>i                       FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»est%>%^DISIMPi               FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Inf:%»est%>idh                     FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+ConNeg:%»est%>%^DISIMPh               FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+VGen:%»est%>%^DISIMPen              FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Act:%»est%>immie           FINAL1 ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ger:%»est%>%^DISIMPeminie          FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+PrfPrc:%»est%>amme                    FINAL1       ;
     +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>%^3sUMLa  FINAL1       ;
         +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>i         FINAL1       ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Inf:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>edh       FINAL1       ;
                +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+VGen:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>en        FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Act:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ger:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>eminie    FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+PrfPrc:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>eme       FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+ConNeg:%»est%»%^adteUMLall%>0h        FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»el%>%^DISIMPe                FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»el%>i                        FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»el%>%^DISIMPi                FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Inf:%»el%>idh                      FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+ConNeg:%»el%>%^DISIMPh                FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+VGen:%»el%>%^DISIMPen               FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Act:%»el%>immie           FINAL1 ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ger:%»el%>%^DISIMPeminie           FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+PrfPrc:%»el%>amme                     FINAL1       ;
      +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1       ;
          +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>i          FINAL1       ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh        FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>en         FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie     FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme        FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»el%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h         FINAL1       ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ijahtj%>%^3sUMLa             FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ijahtj%>i                    FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»ijahtj%>%^DISIMPi            FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»ijahtj%>edh                  FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»ijahtj%>en                   FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»ijahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»ijahtj%>eminie               FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»ijahtj%>eme                  FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»ijahtj%>0h                   FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»ed%>%^DISIMPe                FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ed%>i                        FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»ed%>%^DISIMPi                FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Inf:%»ed%>idh                      FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+ConNeg:%»ed%>%^DISIMPh                FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+VGen:%»ed%>%^DISIMPen               FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Act:%»ed%>immie           FINAL1 ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ger:%»ed%>%^DISIMPeminie           FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+PrfPrc:%»ed%>amme                     FINAL1       ;
      +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1       ;
          +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>i          FINAL1       ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1       ;
