src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Regular_verbs
bïegkedh:bïegk BIEGKEDH "blåsa" ;
bïevledh:bïevl BIEGKEDH "bli barmark" ;
rassedh:rass BIEGKEDH "duggregna" ;
råanjedh:råanj BIEGKEDH "ösregna" ;
rïssedh:rïss BIEGKEDH "duggregna" ;
rïssjedh:rïssj BIEGKEDH "duggregna" ;
savredh:savr BIEGKEDH "duggregna" ;
slavhtjedh:slavhtj BIEGKEDH "sludde" ;
snjïerkedh:snjïerk BIEGKEDH "duggregne, sildre" ;
sïjredh:sïjr BIEGKEDH "duggregna" ;
tjarvedh:tjarv BIEGKEDH "bli skare" ;
tsaapkedh:tsaapk BIEGKEDH "bli skareføre som ikke bærer" ;
